Nevada, session 83, AB284.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy
of the Department of Health and Human Services for carrying out
the provisions of section 2 of this act and making upgrades to
computer systems necessary to carry out those provisions the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $54,728
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $240,004
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
3. Expenditure of the following sums not appropriated from the
State General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
by the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the
Department of Health and Human Services for the same purposes as
set forth in subsection 1:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $188,270
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $700,098
Sec. 2. 1. On or before October 1, 2025, the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services shall submit to the
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services a request to
include under Medicaid:
(a) A rate of reimbursement for a vagus nerve stimulation
therapy device prescribed for the treatment of epilepsy that is
greater than or equal to 82 percent of the acquisition cost of such a
device; and
(b) A rate of reimbursement for any replacement part for a vagus
nerve stimulation therapy device prescribed for the treatment of
epilepsy that is greater than or equal to 82 percent of the acquisition
cost of such a replacement part.
2. The rates of reimbursement established pursuant to
subsection 1 must be separate from and in addition to the rates of
reimbursement for the medical care necessary for implantation or
repair of a vagus nerve stimulation therapy device or the
replacement of a part for such a device.
3. The request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must be
supported using methods for determining rates of reimbursement
accepted by the Secretary.
Sec. 3. 1. This section and section 1 of this act become
effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Section 2 of this act becomes effective on March 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)